src/LexicalMorphonology/LexicalMorphonology.foma
source ../CharacterClasses/CharacterClasses.foma
define Derivational "+" [{ġe}|{ni}|{ži}];
define EmbrV "(" [a|e|i] ")";
define EmbrR "(" [l|n] ">" ")";
define Anaptyxis [..] -> ɑ || C _ (B) n EmbrV "-" n | l EmbrV "-" EmbrR l | r EmbrV "-" EmbrR r;
define DerivAnaptyxis [..] -> ɑ || V C _ C (EmbrV) Derivational;
define RegrVowelAssim [ɑ|ɛ|ɪ|ɔ] -> a || _ "=" [[{tt}|{nn}|{dill}|{ll}] A|{d}|{n}|{dil}|{l}];
define Specification ɛ -> e, ɪ -> i, ɔ -> o || _ ;
define VowelHarmony	ɑ -> a || A [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> e || E [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> i || I [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> O || O [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> u || U [C|"-"]* _ ;
define vDeletion v -> "(" ... ")" || [ž|z] "-" _ ;
define vAssimilation v -> w || U "-" _ ;
define ErgativeSuffixDeletion ("-") ž @-> "(" ... ")" || _ "=" [[{tt}|{mm}|{dill}|{ll}] A|{d}|{m}|{dil}|{l}];
define CompensatoryLengthening a -> ā, e -> ē, i-> ī, o -> ō, u -> ū || _ "(" ("-") ž ")";
define Epenthesis [..] -> {+i} || {-en} | {-dan} _ "=" [[{tt}|{mm}|{dill}|{ff}|{ll}] A|{d}|{m}|{dil}|{v}|{l}];
define nTriple n -> "(" ... ")" || _ B {nn};
define CliticContraction {a=a} -> {(a)=ā} || _ n;
define PartialDevoicing d -> t, ž -> š || Obstruent ("-"|"=") _ , _ ("-"|"=") Obstruent;
define Voicing p -> b, t -> d, k -> g, f -> v, š -> ž, ḫ -> ġ || V (Boundary) _ (Boundary) V ,
														_ (Boundary) R , R (Boundary)_ , _ .#.;
define LexicalMorphonology Anaptyxis .o.
	DerivAnaptyxis .o. RegrVowelAssim .o. Specification .o. VowelHarmony .o.
	vDeletion .o. vAssimilation .o.
	ErgativeSuffixDeletion .o. CompensatoryLengthening .o. Epenthesis .o.
	nTriple .o. CliticContraction .o. PartialDevoicing .o. Voicing;
